test/src/gt-norm-yamls/M-all_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - pappi - ok : # Noun 'tid' - eu tsekattu
     pappi+N+Sg+Nom: pappi
     pappi+N+Sg+Gen: papin
     pappi+N+Sg+Par: pappii
     pappi+N+Sg+Tra: papiksi
     pappi+N+Sg+Abe: papitta
     pappi+N+Sg+Ine: papissa
     pappi+N+Sg+Ela: papista
     pappi+N+Sg+Ill: papphiin
     pappi+N+Sg+Ade: papila
     pappi+N+Sg+Abl: papilta
     pappi+N+Sg+All: papile
     pappi+N+Sg+Ess: pappina
     pappi+N+Pl+Nom: papit
     pappi+N+Pl+Gen: pappiin
     pappi+N+Pl+Par: pappii
     pappi+N+Pl+Tra: papiiksi
     pappi+N+Pl+Abe: papiitta
     pappi+N+Pl+Ine: papiissa
     pappi+N+Pl+Ela: papiista
     pappi+N+Pl+Ill: papphiin
     pappi+N+Pl+Ade: papiila
     pappi+N+Pl+Abl: papiilta
     pappi+N+Pl+All: papiile
     pappi+N+Pl+Ess: pappiina
     pappi+N+Pl+Com: pappiine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - poika - ok : # Noun 'boy' - ok
     poika+N+Sg+Nom: poika
     poika+N+Sg+Gen: pojan
     poika+N+Sg+Par: poikkaa
     poika+N+Sg+Tra: pojaksi
     poika+N+Sg+Abe: pojatta
     poika+N+Sg+Ine: pojassa
     poika+N+Sg+Ela: pojasta
     poika+N+Sg+Ill: poikhaan
     poika+N+Sg+Ade: pojala
     poika+N+Sg+Abl: pojalta
     poika+N+Sg+All: pojale
     poika+N+Sg+Ess: poikana
     poika+N+Pl+Nom: pojat
     poika+N+Pl+Gen: poikkiin
     poika+N+Pl+Par: poikkii
     poika+N+Pl+Tra: pojiksi
     poika+N+Pl+Abe: pojitta
     poika+N+Pl+Ine: pojissa
     poika+N+Pl+Ela: pojista
     poika+N+Pl+Ill: poikhiin
     poika+N+Pl+Ade: pojila
     poika+N+Pl+Abl: pojilta
     poika+N+Pl+All: pojile
     poika+N+Pl+Ess: poikina
     poika+N+Pl+Com: poikine
     


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - rakas - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'kjære' - ei tsekattu
     rakas+N+Sg+Nom: rakas
     rakas+N+Sg+Gen: rakkhaan
     rakas+N+Sg+Par: rakasta
     rakas+N+Sg+Tra: rakkhaaksi
     rakas+N+Sg+Abe: rakkhaatta
     rakas+N+Sg+Ine: rakkhaassa
     rakas+N+Sg+Ela: rakkhaasta
     rakas+N+Sg+Ill: rakkhaasseen
     rakas+N+Sg+Ade: rakkhaala
     rakas+N+Sg+Abl: rakkhaalta
     rakas+N+Sg+All: rakkhaale
     rakas+N+Sg+Ess: rakkhaana
     rakas+N+Pl+Nom: rakkhaat
     rakas+N+Pl+Gen: rakkhaitten
     rakas+N+Pl+Par: rakkhaita
     rakas+N+Pl+Tra: rakkhaiksi
     rakas+N+Pl+Abe: rakkhaitta
     rakas+N+Pl+Ine: rakkhaissa
     rakas+N+Pl+Ela: rakkhaista
     rakas+N+Pl+Ill: rakkhaissiin
     rakas+N+Pl+Ade: rakkhaila
     rakas+N+Pl+Abl: rakkhailta
     rakas+N+Pl+All: rakkhaile
     rakas+N+Pl+Ess: rakkhaina
     rakas+N+Pl+Com: rakkhaine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ruvis - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     ruvis+N+Sg+Nom: ruvis
     ruvis+N+Sg+Gen: rukhiin
     ruvis+N+Sg+Par: ruvista
     ruvis+N+Sg+Tra: rukhiiksi
     ruvis+N+Sg+Abe: rukhiitta
     ruvis+N+Sg+Ine: rukhiissa
     ruvis+N+Sg+Ela: rukhiista
     ruvis+N+Sg+Ill: rukhiisseen
     ruvis+N+Sg+Ade: rukhiila
     ruvis+N+Sg+Abl: rukhiilta
     ruvis+N+Sg+All: rukhiile
     ruvis+N+Sg+Ess: rukhiina
     ruvis+N+Pl+Nom: rukhiit
     ruvis+N+Pl+Gen: rukhiitten
     ruvis+N+Pl+Par: rukhiita
     ruvis+N+Pl+Tra: rukhiiksi
     ruvis+N+Pl+Abe: rukhiitta
     ruvis+N+Pl+Ine: rukhiissa
     ruvis+N+Pl+Ela: rukhiista
     ruvis+N+Pl+Ill: rukhiissiin
     ruvis+N+Pl+Ade: rukhiila
     ruvis+N+Pl+Abl: rukhiilta
     ruvis+N+Pl+All: rukhiile
     ruvis+N+Pl+Ess: rukhiina
     ruvis+N+Pl+Com: rukhiine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - maa - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'sykdom' - ei tsekattu
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Nom: sairhaus
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Gen: sairhauđen
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Par: sairhautta
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Tra: sairhauđeksi
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Abe: sairhauđetta
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Ine: sairhauđessa
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Ela: sairhauđesta
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Ill: sairhautheen
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Ade: sairhauđella
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Abl: sairhauđelta
     sairhaus+N+Sg+All: sairhauđelle
     sairhaus+N+Sg+Ess: sairhautenna
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Nom: sairhauđet
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Gen: sairhauksiitten
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Par: sairhauksiita
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Tra: sairhauksiksi
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Abe: sairhauksitta
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Ine: sairhauksissa
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Ela: sairhauksista
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Ill: sairhaukshiin
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Ade: sairhauksilla
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Abl: sairhauksilta
     sairhaus+N+Pl+All: sairhauksille
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Ess: sairhauksinna
     sairhaus+N+Pl+Com: sairhauksine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sieni - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'år' - ei tsekattu
     sieni+N+Sg+Nom: sieni
     sieni+N+Sg+Gen: sienen
     sieni+N+Sg+Par: sientä
     sieni+N+Sg+Tra: sieneksi
     sieni+N+Sg+Abe: sienettä
     sieni+N+Sg+Ine: sienessä
     sieni+N+Sg+Ela: sienestä
     sieni+N+Sg+Ill: sienheen
     sieni+N+Sg+Ade: sienelä
     sieni+N+Sg+Abl: sieneltä
     sieni+N+Sg+All: sienele
     sieni+N+Sg+Ess: sienenä
     sieni+N+Pl+Nom: sienet
     sieni+N+Pl+Gen: sieniin
     sieni+N+Pl+Par: sienii
     sieni+N+Pl+Tra: sieniksi
     sieni+N+Pl+Abe: sienittä
     sieni+N+Pl+Ine: sienissä
     sieni+N+Pl+Ela: sienistä
     sieni+N+Pl+Ill: sienhiin
     sieni+N+Pl+Ade: sienilä
     sieni+N+Pl+Abl: sieniltä
     sieni+N+Pl+All: sienile
     sieni+N+Pl+Ess: sieninä
     sieni+N+Pl+Com: sienine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sivakka: # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     sivakka+N+Sg+Nom: sivakka
     sivakka+N+Sg+Gen: sivakan
     sivakka+N+Sg+Par: sivakkaa
     sivakka+N+Sg+Tra: sivakaksi
     sivakka+N+Sg+Abe: sivakatta
     sivakka+N+Sg+Ine: sivakassa
     sivakka+N+Sg+Ela: sivakasta
     sivakka+N+Sg+Ill: sivakkhaan
     sivakka+N+Sg+Ade: sivakalla
     sivakka+N+Sg+Abl: sivakalta
     sivakka+N+Sg+All: sivakalle
     sivakka+N+Sg+Ess: sivakkanna
     sivakka+N+Pl+Nom: sivakat
     sivakka+N+Pl+Gen: sivakoitten
     sivakka+N+Pl+Par: sivakoita
     sivakka+N+Pl+Tra: sivakoiksi
     sivakka+N+Pl+Abe: sivakoitta
     sivakka+N+Pl+Ine: sivakoissa
     sivakka+N+Pl+Ela: sivakoista
     sivakka+N+Pl+Ill: sivakkhoin
     sivakka+N+Pl+Ade: sivakoilla
     sivakka+N+Pl+Abl: sivakoilta
     sivakka+N+Pl+All: sivakoille
     sivakka+N+Pl+Ess: sivakkoina
     sivakka+N+Pl+Com: sivakkoine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - suomi - ok : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     suomi+N+Sg+Nom: suomi
     suomi+N+Sg+Gen: suomen
     suomi+N+Sg+Par: suomee
     suomi+N+Sg+Tra: suomeksi
     suomi+N+Sg+Abe: suometta
     suomi+N+Sg+Ine: suomessa
     suomi+N+Sg+Ela: suomesta
     suomi+N+Sg+Ill: suomheen
     suomi+N+Sg+Ade: suomela
     suomi+N+Sg+Abl: suomelta
     suomi+N+Sg+All: suomele
     suomi+N+Sg+Ess: suomena
     suomi+N+Pl+Nom: suomet
     suomi+N+Pl+Gen: suomiin
     suomi+N+Pl+Par: suomii
     suomi+N+Pl+Tra: suomiksi
     suomi+N+Pl+Ine: suomissa
     suomi+N+Pl+Ela: suomista
     suomi+N+Pl+Ill: suomhiin
     suomi+N+Pl+Abe: suomitta
     suomi+N+Pl+Ade: suomila
     suomi+N+Pl+Abl: suomilta
     suomi+N+Pl+All: suomile
     suomi+N+Pl+Ess: suomina
     suomi+N+Pl+Com: suomine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: rerun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - syksy - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'høst' - ei tsekattu
     syksy+N+Sg+Nom: syksy
     syksy+N+Sg+Gen: syksyn
     syksy+N+Sg+Par: syksyy
     syksy+N+Sg+Tra: syksyksi
     syksy+N+Sg+Abe: syksyttä
     syksy+N+Sg+Ine: syksyssä
     syksy+N+Sg+Ela: syksystä
     syksy+N+Sg+Ill: sykshyyn
     syksy+N+Sg+Ade: syksylä
     syksy+N+Sg+Abl: syksyltä
     syksy+N+Sg+All: syksyle
     syksy+N+Sg+Ess: syksynä
     syksy+N+Pl+Nom: syksyt
     syksy+N+Pl+Gen: syksyin
     syksy+N+Pl+Par: syksyi
     syksy+N+Pl+Tra: syksyiksi
     syksy+N+Pl+Abe: syksyittä
     syksy+N+Pl+Ine: syksyissä
     syksy+N+Pl+Ela: syksyistä
     syksy+N+Pl+Ill: sykshyin
     syksy+N+Pl+Ade: syksyilä
     syksy+N+Pl+Abl: syksyiltä
     syksy+N+Pl+All: syksyile
     syksy+N+Pl+Ess: syksyinä
     syksy+N+Pl+Com: syksyine
     


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - taival - ok : # Noun 'walk' -
     taival+N+Sg+Nom: taival
     taival+N+Sg+Gen: taipalen
     taival+N+Sg+Par: taivalta
     taival+N+Sg+Tra: taipaleksi
     taival+N+Sg+Abe: taipaletta
     taival+N+Sg+Ine: taipalessa
     taival+N+Sg+Ela: taipalesta
     taival+N+Sg+Ill: taipalheen
     taival+N+Sg+Ade: taipalella
     taival+N+Sg+Abl: taipalelta
     taival+N+Sg+All: taipalelle
     taival+N+Sg+Ess: taipalenna
     taival+N+Pl+Nom: taipalet
     taival+N+Pl+Gen: taipaliitten
     taival+N+Pl+Par: taipaliita
     taival+N+Pl+Tra: taipaliksi
     taival+N+Pl+Abe: taipalitta
     taival+N+Pl+Ine: taipalissa
     taival+N+Pl+Ela: taipalista
     taival+N+Pl+Ill: taipalhiin
     taival+N+Pl+Ade: taipalilla
     taival+N+Pl+Abl: taipalilta
     taival+N+Pl+All: taipalille
     taival+N+Pl+Com: taipaline
     taival+N+Pl+Ess: taipalinna


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - tervheiset - ok : # Noun 'tid' - ei tsekattu
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Nom: tervheiset
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Gen: tervheisten
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Par: tervheisii
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Tra: tervheisiksi
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Abe: tervheisittä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Ine: tervheisissä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Ela: tervheisistä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Ill: tervheishiin
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Ade: tervheisillä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Abl: tervheisiltä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+All: tervheisille
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Ess: tervheisinnä
     tervheiset+N+Pl+Com: tervheisine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - tooli - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     tooli+N+Sg+Nom: tooli
     tooli+N+Sg+Gen: toolin
     tooli+N+Sg+Par: toolii
     tooli+N+Sg+Tra: tooliksi
     tooli+N+Sg+Abe: toolitta
     tooli+N+Sg+Ine: toolissa
     tooli+N+Sg+Ela: toolista
     tooli+N+Sg+Ill: toolhiin
     tooli+N+Sg+Ade: toolila
     tooli+N+Sg+Abl: toolilta
     tooli+N+Sg+All: toolile
     tooli+N+Sg+Ess: toolina
     tooli+N+Pl+Nom: toolit
     tooli+N+Pl+Gen: tooliin
     tooli+N+Pl+Gen: toolitten
     tooli+N+Pl+Par: toolii
     tooli+N+Pl+Tra: tooliiksi
     tooli+N+Pl+Abe: tooliitta
     tooli+N+Pl+Ine: tooliissa
     tooli+N+Pl+Ela: tooliista
     tooli+N+Pl+Ill: toolhiin
     tooli+N+Pl+Ade: tooliila
     tooli+N+Pl+Abl: tooliilta
     tooli+N+Pl+All: tooliile
     tooli+N+Pl+Ess: tooliina
     tooli+N+Pl+Com: tooliine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - tunturi: # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     tunturi+N+Sg+Nom: tunturi
     tunturi+N+Sg+Gen: tunturin
     tunturi+N+Sg+Par: tunturii
     tunturi+N+Sg+Tra: tunturiksi
     tunturi+N+Sg+Abe: tunturitta
     tunturi+N+Sg+Ine: tunturissa
     tunturi+N+Sg+Ela: tunturista
     tunturi+N+Sg+Ill: tunturhiin
     tunturi+N+Sg+Ade: tunturilla
     tunturi+N+Sg+Abl: tunturilta
     tunturi+N+Sg+All: tunturille
     tunturi+N+Sg+Ess: tunturinna
     tunturi+N+Pl+Nom: tunturit
     tunturi+N+Pl+Gen: tunturiitten
     tunturi+N+Pl+Par: tunturiita
     tunturi+N+Pl+Tra: tunturiiksi
     tunturi+N+Pl+Abe: tunturiitta
     tunturi+N+Pl+Ine: tunturiissa
     tunturi+N+Pl+Ela: tunturiista
     tunturi+N+Pl+Ill: tunturhiin
     tunturi+N+Pl+Ade: tunturiilla
     tunturi+N+Pl+Abl: tunturiilta
     tunturi+N+Pl+All: tunturiille
     tunturi+N+Pl+Ess: tunturiina
     tunturi+N+Pl+Com: tunturiine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
